lib/vendor/Text_TeXHyphen/hyph_bg_BG.tex
.סןכ8
בןכ8
הןכ8
חןכ8
עןכ8
.ןל8
8ןל.
.גןל8
.סןל8
בןל8
הןל8
חןל8
עןל8
.ןם8
8ןם.
.גןם8
.סןם8
בןם8
הןם8
חןם8
עןם8
.ןן8
8ןן.
.גןן8
.סןן8
בןן8
הןן8
חןן8
עןן8
.ןנ8
8ןנ.
.גןנ8
.סןנ8
בןנ8
הןנ8
חןנ8
עןנ8
.ןס8
8ןס.
.גןס8
.סןס8
בןס8
הןס8
חןס8
עןס8
.ןע8
8ןע.
.גןע8
.סןע8
בןע8
הןע8
חןע8
עןע8
.ןפ8
8ןפ.
.גןפ8
.סןפ8
בןפ8
הןפ8
חןפ8
עןפ8
.ןץ8
8ןץ.
.גןץ8
.סןץ8
בןץ8
הןץ8
חןץ8
עןץ8
.ןצ8
8ןצ.
.גןצ8
.סןצ8
בןצ8
הןצ8
חןצ8
עןצ8
.ןק8
8ןק.
.גןק8
.סןק8
בןק8
הןק8
חןק8
עןק8
.ןר8
8ןר.
.גןר8
.סןר8
בןר8
הןר8
חןר8
עןר8
.ןש8
8ןש.
.גןש8
.סןש8
בןש8
הןש8
חןש8
עןש8
.נ8
8נ.
.נב8
8נב.
.גנב8
.סנב8
בנב8
הנב8
חנב8
ענב8
.נג8
8נג.
.גנג8
.סנג8
בנג8
הנג8
חנג8
ענג8
.נד8
8נד.
.גנד8
.סנד8
בנד8
הנד8
חנד8
ענד8
.נה8
8נה.
.גנה8
.סנה8
בנה8
הנה8
חנה8
ענה8
.נז8
8נז.
.גנז8
.סנז8
בנז8
הנז8
חנז8
ענז8
.נח8
8נח.
.גנח8
.סנח8
בנח8
הנח8
חנח8
ענח8
.ני8
8ני.
.גני8
.סני8
בני8
הני8
חני8
עני8
.נך8
8נך.
.גנך8
.סנך8
בנך8
הנך8
חנך8
ענך8
.נכ8
8נכ.
.גנכ8
.סנכ8
בנכ8
הנכ8
חנכ8
ענכ8
.נל8
8נל.
.גנל8
.סנל8
בנל8
הנל8
חנל8
ענל8
.נם8
8נם.
.גנם8
.סנם8
בנם8
הנם8
חנם8
ענם8
.נן8
8נן.
.גנן8
.סנן8
בנן8
הנן8
חנן8
ענן8
.ננ8
8ננ.
.גננ8
.סננ8
בננ8
הננ8
חננ8
עננ8
.נס8
8נס.
.גנס8
.סנס8
בנס8
הנס8
חנס8
ענס8
.נע8
8נע.
.גנע8
.סנע8
בנע8
הנע8
חנע8
ענע8
.נפ8
8נפ.
.גנפ8
.סנפ8
בנפ8
הנפ8
חנפ8
ענפ8
.נץ8
8נץ.
.גנץ8
.סנץ8
בנץ8
הנץ8
חנץ8
ענץ8
.נצ8
8נצ.
.גנצ8
.סנצ8
בנצ8
הנצ8
חנצ8
ענצ8
.נק8
8נק.
.גנק8
.סנק8
בנק8
הנק8
חנק8
ענק8
.נר8
8נר.
.גנר8
.סנר8
בנר8
הנר8
חנר8
ענר8
.נש8
8נש.
.גנש8
.סנש8
בנש8
הנש8
חנש8
ענש8
.ס8
8ס.
.סב8
8סב.
.גסב8
.ססב8
בסב8
הסב8
חסב8
עסב8
.סג8
8סג.
.גסג8
.ססג8
בסג8
הסג8
חסג8
עסג8
.סד8
8סד.
.גסד8
.ססד8
בסד8
הסד8
חסד8
עסד8
.סה8
8סה.
.גסה8
.ססה8
בסה8
הסה8
חסה8
עסה8
.סז8
8סז.
.גסז8
.ססז8
בסז8
הסז8
חסז8
עסז8
.סח8
8סח.
.גסח8
.ססח8
בסח8
הסח8
חסח8
עסח8
.סי8
8סי.
.גסי8
.ססי8
בסי8
הסי8
חסי8
עסי8
.סך8
8סך.
.גסך8
.ססך8
בסך8
הסך8
חסך8
עסך8
.סכ8
8סכ.
.גסכ8
.ססכ8
בסכ8
הסכ8
חסכ8
עסכ8
.סל8
8סל.
.גסל8
.ססל8
בסל8
הסל8
חסל8
עסל8
.סם8
8סם.
.גסם8
.ססם8
בסם8
הסם8
חסם8
עסם8
.סן8
8סן.
.גסן8
.ססן8
בסן8
הסן8
חסן8
עסן8
.סנ8
8סנ.
.גסנ8
.ססנ8
בסנ8
הסנ8
חסנ8
עסנ8
.סס8
8סס.
.גסס8
.ססס8
בסס8
הסס8
חסס8
עסס8
.סע8
8סע.
.גסע8
.ססע8
בסע8
הסע8
חסע8
עסע8
.ספ8
8ספ.
.גספ8
.סספ8
בספ8
הספ8
חספ8
עספ8
.סץ8
8סץ.
.גסץ8
.ססץ8
בסץ8
הסץ8
חסץ8
עסץ8
.סצ8
8סצ.
.גסצ8
.ססצ8
בסצ8
הסצ8
חסצ8
עסצ8
.סק8
8סק.
.גסק8
.ססק8
בסק8
הסק8
חסק8
עסק8
.סר8
8סר.
.גסר8
.ססר8
בסר8
הסר8
חסר8
עסר8
.סש8
8סש.
.גסש8
.ססש8
בסש8
הסש8
חסש8
עסש8
.ע8
8ע.
.עב8
8עב.
.געב8
.סעב8
בעב8
העב8
חעב8
עעב8
.עג8
8עג.
.געג8
.סעג8
בעג8
העג8
חעג8
עעג8
.עד8
8עד.
.געד8
.סעד8
בעד8
העד8
חעד8
עעד8
.עה8
8עה.
.געה8
.סעה8
בעה8
העה8
חעה8
עעה8
.עז8
8עז.
.געז8
.סעז8
בעז8
העז8
חעז8
עעז8
.עח8
8עח.
.געח8
.סעח8
בעח8
העח8
חעח8
עעח8
.עי8
8עי.
.געי8
.סעי8
בעי8
העי8
חעי8
עעי8
.עך8
8עך.
.געך8
.סעך8
בעך8
העך8
חעך8
עעך8
.עכ8
8עכ.
.געכ8
.סעכ8
בעכ8
העכ8
חעכ8
עעכ8
.על8
8על.
.געל8
.סעל8
בעל8
העל8
חעל8
עעל8
.עם8
8עם.
.געם8
.סעם8
בעם8
העם8
חעם8
עעם8
.ען8
8ען.
.גען8
.סען8
בען8
הען8
חען8
עען8
.ענ8
8ענ.
.גענ8
.סענ8
בענ8
הענ8
חענ8
עענ8
.עס8
8עס.
.געס8
.סעס8
בעס8
העס8
חעס8
עעס8
.עע8
8עע.
.געע8
.סעע8
בעע8
העע8
חעע8
עעע8
.עפ8
8עפ.
.געפ8
.סעפ8
בעפ8
העפ8
חעפ8
עעפ8
.עץ8
8עץ.
.געץ8
.סעץ8
בעץ8
העץ8
חעץ8
עעץ8
.עצ8
8עצ.
.געצ8
.סעצ8
בעצ8
העצ8
חעצ8
עעצ8
.עק8
8עק.
.געק8
.סעק8
בעק8
העק8
חעק8
עעק8
.ער8
8ער.
.גער8
.סער8
בער8
הער8
חער8
עער8
.עש8
8עש.
.געש8
.סעש8
בעש8
העש8
חעש8
עעש8
.פ8
8פ.
.פב8
8פב.
.גפב8
.ספב8
בפב8
הפב8
חפב8
עפב8
.פג8
8פג.
.גפג8
.ספג8
בפג8
הפג8
חפג8
עפג8
.פד8
8פד.
.גפד8
.ספד8
בפד8
הפד8
חפד8
עפד8
.פה8
8פה.
.גפה8
.ספה8
בפה8
הפה8
חפה8
עפה8
.פז8
8פז.
.גפז8
.ספז8
בפז8
הפז8
חפז8
עפז8
.פח8
8פח.
.גפח8
.ספח8
בפח8
הפח8
חפח8
עפח8
.פי8
8פי.
.גפי8
.ספי8
בפי8
הפי8
חפי8
עפי8
.פך8
8פך.
.גפך8
.ספך8
בפך8
הפך8
חפך8
עפך8
.פכ8
8פכ.
.גפכ8
.ספכ8
בפכ8
הפכ8
חפכ8
עפכ8
.פל8
8פל.
.גפל8
.ספל8
בפל8
הפל8
חפל8
עפל8
.פם8
8פם.
.גפם8
.ספם8
בפם8
הפם8
חפם8
עפם8
.פן8
8פן.
.גפן8
.ספן8
בפן8
הפן8
חפן8
עפן8
.פנ8
8פנ.
.גפנ8
.ספנ8
בפנ8
הפנ8
חפנ8
עפנ8
.פס8
8פס.
.גפס8
.ספס8
בפס8
הפס8
חפס8
עפס8
.פע8
8פע.
.גפע8
.ספע8
בפע8
הפע8
חפע8
עפע8
.פפ8
8פפ.
.גפפ8
.ספפ8
בפפ8
הפפ8
חפפ8
עפפ8
.פץ8
8פץ.
.גפץ8
.ספץ8
בפץ8
הפץ8
חפץ8
עפץ8
.פצ8
8פצ.
.גפצ8
.ספצ8
בפצ8
הפצ8
חפצ8
עפצ8
.פק8
8פק.
.גפק8
.ספק8
בפק8
הפק8
חפק8
עפק8
.פר8
8פר.
.גפר8
.ספר8
בפר8
הפר8
חפר8
עפר8
.פש8
8פש.
.גפש8
.ספש8
בפש8
הפש8
חפש8
עפש8
.ץ8
8ץ.
.ץב8
8ץב.
.גץב8
.סץב8
בץב8
הץב8
חץב8
עץב8
.ץג8
8ץג.
.גץג8
.סץג8
בץג8
הץג8
חץג8
עץג8
.ץד8
8ץד.
.גץד8
.סץד8
בץד8
הץד8
חץד8
עץד8
.ץה8
8ץה.
.גץה8
.סץה8
בץה8
הץה8
חץה8
עץה8
.ץז8
8ץז.
.גץז8
.סץז8
בץז8
הץז8
חץז8
עץז8
.ץח8
8ץח.
.גץח8
.סץח8
בץח8
הץח8
חץח8
עץח8
.ץי8
8ץי.
.גץי8
.סץי8
בץי8
הץי8
חץי8
עץי8
.ץך8
8ץך.
.גץך8
.סץך8
בץך8
הץך8
חץך8
עץך8
.ץכ8
8ץכ.
.גץכ8
.סץכ8
בץכ8
הץכ8
חץכ8
עץכ8
.ץל8
8ץל.
.גץל8
.סץל8
בץל8
הץל8
חץל8
עץל8
.ץם8
8ץם.
.גץם8
.סץם8
בץם8
הץם8
חץם8
עץם8
.ץן8
8ץן.
.גץן8
.סץן8
בץן8
הץן8
חץן8
עץן8
.ץנ8
8ץנ.
.גץנ8
.סץנ8
בץנ8
הץנ8
חץנ8
עץנ8
.ץס8
8ץס.
.גץס8
.סץס8
בץס8
הץס8
חץס8
עץס8
.ץע8
8ץע.
.גץע8
.סץע8
בץע8
הץע8
חץע8
עץע8
.ץפ8
8ץפ.
.גץפ8
.סץפ8
בץפ8
הץפ8
חץפ8
עץפ8
.ץץ8
8ץץ.
.גץץ8
.סץץ8
בץץ8
הץץ8
חץץ8
עץץ8
.ץצ8
8ץצ.
.גץצ8
.סץצ8
בץצ8
הץצ8
חץצ8
עץצ8
.ץק8
8ץק.
.גץק8
.סץק8
בץק8
הץק8
חץק8
עץק8
.ץר8
8ץר.
.גץר8
.סץר8
בץר8
הץר8
חץר8
עץר8
.ץש8
8ץש.
.גץש8
.סץש8
בץש8
הץש8
חץש8
עץש8
.צ8
8צ.
.צב8
8צב.
.גצב8
.סצב8
בצב8
הצב8
חצב8
עצב8
.צג8
8צג.
.גצג8
.סצג8
בצג8
הצג8
חצג8
עצג8
.צד8
8צד.
.גצד8
.סצד8
בצד8
הצד8
חצד8
עצד8
.צה8
8צה.
.גצה8
.סצה8
בצה8
הצה8
חצה8
עצה8
.צז8
8צז.
.גצז8
.סצז8
בצז8
הצז8
חצז8
עצז8
.צח8
8צח.
.גצח8
.סצח8
בצח8
הצח8
חצח8
עצח8
.צי8
8צי.
.גצי8
.סצי8
בצי8
הצי8
חצי8
עצי8
.צך8
8צך.
.גצך8
.סצך8
בצך8
הצך8
חצך8
עצך8
.צכ8
8צכ.
.גצכ8
.סצכ8
בצכ8
הצכ8
חצכ8
עצכ8
.צל8
8צל.
.גצל8
.סצל8
בצל8
הצל8
חצל8
עצל8
.צם8
8צם.
.גצם8
.סצם8
בצם8
הצם8
חצם8
עצם8
.צן8
8צן.
.גצן8
.סצן8
בצן8
הצן8
חצן8
עצן8
.צנ8
8צנ.
.גצנ8
.סצנ8
בצנ8
הצנ8
חצנ8
עצנ8
.צס8
8צס.
.גצס8
.סצס8
בצס8
הצס8
חצס8
עצס8
.צע8
8צע.
.גצע8
.סצע8
בצע8
הצע8
חצע8
עצע8
.צפ8
8צפ.
.גצפ8
.סצפ8
בצפ8
הצפ8
חצפ8
עצפ8
.צץ8
8צץ.
.גצץ8
.סצץ8
בצץ8
הצץ8
חצץ8
עצץ8
.צצ8
8צצ.
.גצצ8
.סצצ8
בצצ8
הצצ8
חצצ8
עצצ8
.צק8
8צק.
.גצק8
.סצק8
בצק8
הצק8
חצק8
עצק8
.צר8
8צר.
.גצר8
.סצר8
בצר8
הצר8
חצר8
עצר8
.צש8
8צש.
.גצש8
.סצש8
בצש8
הצש8
חצש8
עצש8
.ק8
8ק.
.קב8
8קב.
.גקב8
.סקב8
בקב8
הקב8
חקב8
עקב8
.קג8
8קג.
.גקג8
.סקג8
בקג8
הקג8
חקג8
עקג8
.קד8
8קד.
.גקד8
.סקד8
בקד8
הקד8
חקד8
עקד8
.קה8
8קה.
.גקה8
.סקה8
בקה8
הקה8
חקה8
עקה8
.קז8
8קז.
.גקז8
.סקז8
בקז8
הקז8
חקז8
עקז8
.קח8
8קח.
.גקח8
.סקח8
בקח8
הקח8
חקח8
עקח8
.קי8
8קי.
.גקי8
.סקי8
בקי8
הקי8
חקי8
עקי8
.קך8
8קך.
.גקך8
.סקך8
בקך8
הקך8
חקך8
עקך8
.קכ8
8קכ.
.גקכ8
.סקכ8
בקכ8
הקכ8
חקכ8
עקכ8
.קל8
8קל.
.גקל8
.סקל8
בקל8
הקל8
חקל8
עקל8
.קם8
8קם.
.גקם8
.סקם8
בקם8
הקם8
חקם8
עקם8
.קן8
8קן.
.גקן8
.סקן8
בקן8
הקן8
חקן8
עקן8
.קנ8
8קנ.
.גקנ8
.סקנ8
בקנ8
הקנ8
חקנ8
עקנ8
.קס8
8קס.
.גקס8
.סקס8
בקס8
הקס8
חקס8
עקס8
.קע8
8קע.
.גקע8
.סקע8
בקע8
הקע8
חקע8
עקע8
.קפ8
8קפ.
.גקפ8
.סקפ8
בקפ8
הקפ8
חקפ8
עקפ8
.קץ8
8קץ.
.גקץ8
.סקץ8
בקץ8
הקץ8
חקץ8
עקץ8
.קצ8
8קצ.
.גקצ8
.סקצ8
בקצ8
הקצ8
חקצ8
עקצ8
.קק8
8קק.
.גקק8
.סקק8
בקק8
הקק8
חקק8
עקק8
.קר8
8קר.
.גקר8
.סקר8
בקר8
הקר8
חקר8
עקר8
.קש8
8קש.
.גקש8
.סקש8
בקש8
הקש8
חקש8
עקש8
.ר8
8ר.
.רב8
8רב.
.גרב8
.סרב8
ברב8
הרב8
חרב8
ערב8
.רג8
8רג.
.גרג8
.סרג8
ברג8
הרג8
חרג8
ערג8
.רד8
8רד.
.גרד8
.סרד8
ברד8
הרד8
חרד8
ערד8
.רה8
8רה.
.גרה8
.סרה8
ברה8
הרה8
חרה8
ערה8
.רז8
8רז.
.גרז8
.סרז8
ברז8
הרז8
חרז8
ערז8
.רח8
8רח.
.גרח8
.סרח8
ברח8
הרח8
חרח8
ערח8
.רי8
8רי.
.גרי8
.סרי8
ברי8
הרי8
חרי8
ערי8
.רך8
8רך.
.גרך8
.סרך8
ברך8
הרך8
חרך8
ערך8
.רכ8
8רכ.
.גרכ8
.סרכ8
ברכ8
הרכ8
חרכ8
ערכ8
.רל8
8רל.
.גרל8
.סרל8
ברל8
הרל8
חרל8
ערל8
.רם8
8רם.
.גרם8
.סרם8
ברם8
הרם8
חרם8
ערם8
.רן8
8רן.
.גרן8
.סרן8
ברן8
הרן8
חרן8
ערן8
.רנ8
8רנ.
.גרנ8
.סרנ8
ברנ8
הרנ8
חרנ8
ערנ8
.רס8
8רס.
.גרס8
.סרס8
ברס8
הרס8
חרס8
ערס8
.רע8
8רע.
.גרע8
.סרע8
ברע8
הרע8
חרע8
ערע8
.רפ8
8רפ.
.גרפ8
.סרפ8
ברפ8
הרפ8
חרפ8
ערפ8
.רץ8
8רץ.
.גרץ8
.סרץ8
ברץ8
הרץ8
חרץ8
ערץ8
.רצ8
8רצ.
.גרצ8
.סרצ8
ברצ8
הרצ8
חרצ8
ערצ8
.רק8
8רק.
.גרק8
.סרק8
ברק8
הרק8
חרק8
ערק8
.רר8
8רר.
.גרר8
.סרר8
ברר8
הרר8
חרר8
ערר8
.רש8
8רש.
.גרש8
.סרש8
ברש8
הרש8
חרש8
ערש8
.ש8
8ש.
.שב8
8שב.
.גשב8
.סשב8
בשב8
השב8
חשב8
עשב8
.שג8
8שג.
.גשג8
.סשג8
בשג8
השג8
חשג8
עשג8
.שד8
8שד.
.גשד8
.סשד8
בשד8
השד8
חשד8
עשד8
.שה8
8שה.
.גשה8
.סשה8
בשה8
השה8
חשה8
עשה8
.שז8
8שז.
.גשז8
.סשז8
בשז8
השז8
חשז8
עשז8
.שח8
8שח.
.גשח8
.סשח8
בשח8
השח8
חשח8
עשח8
.שי8
8שי.
.גשי8
.סשי8
בשי8
השי8
חשי8
עשי8
.שך8
8שך.
.גשך8
.סשך8
בשך8
השך8
חשך8
עשך8
.שכ8
8שכ.
.גשכ8
.סשכ8
בשכ8
השכ8
חשכ8
עשכ8
.של8
8של.
.גשל8
.סשל8
בשל8
השל8
חשל8
עשל8
.שם8
8שם.
.גשם8
.סשם8
בשם8
השם8
חשם8
עשם8
.שן8
8שן.
.גשן8
.סשן8
בשן8
השן8
חשן8
עשן8
.שנ8
8שנ.
.גשנ8
.סשנ8
בשנ8
השנ8
חשנ8
עשנ8
.שס8
8שס.
.גשס8
.סשס8
בשס8
השס8
חשס8
עשס8
.שע8
8שע.
.גשע8
.סשע8
בשע8
השע8
חשע8
עשע8
.שפ8
8שפ.
.גשפ8
.סשפ8
בשפ8
השפ8
חשפ8
עשפ8
.שץ8
8שץ.
.גשץ8
.סשץ8
בשץ8
השץ8
חשץ8
עשץ8
.שצ8
8שצ.
.גשצ8
.סשצ8
בשצ8
השצ8
חשצ8
עשצ8
.שק8
8שק.
.גשק8
.סשק8
בשק8
השק8
חשק8
עשק8
.שר8
8שר.
.גשר8
.סשר8
בשר8
השר8
חשר8
עשר8
.שש8
8שש.
.גשש8
.סשש8
בשש8
השש8
חשש8
עשש8
